Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.022

Transition to defined districts and areas.

(1) To accomplish the transition to the newly defined districts and areas as described in RCW 15.44.027, the initial producer appointments are as follows:

(a) The current incumbent representing district one must be appointed to the new district four position with an expiration date of June 30, 2015;

(b) The current incumbent representing district two must be appointed to the eastern Washington at large position with an expiration date of June 30, 2015;

(c) The current incumbent representing district three must be appointed to the new district one position with an expiration date of June 30, 2013;

(d) The current incumbent representing district four must be appointed to the new district three position with an expiration date of June 30, 2013;

(e) The current incumbent representing district five must be appointed to the state at large position with an expiration date of June 30, 2014;

(f) The current incumbent representing district six must be appointed to the new western Washington at large position with an expiration date of June 30, 2014;

(g) The current incumbent representing district seven must be appointed to the new district two position with an expiration date of June 30, 2014; and

(h) The current incumbent representing dealers must be appointed to the dealer position with an expiration date of June 30, 2013.

(2) Thereafter, producer and dealer members are nominated and appointed as provided for under RCW 15.44.021 and 15.44.033.

[ 2012 c 107 s 4; 2003 c 396 s 28.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.